src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_f/angen__vb_01
IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^Umlaut IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^Umlaut  IND-PRS-SG3 ;
IND-PRS-PL1 ;
IND-PRS-PL2 ;
IND-PRS-PL3 ;

:%^A2I IND-PRT_SEIN ;
: SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^A2I SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2: POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON V_/dürfen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ dürfen:darf
+V00@R.PTC.ON@:%^A2U%>t@R.PTC.ON@  Praf ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_/dürfen__vb_01 ;
+V@D.PTC@:%^A2Ü@D.PTC@ Inf ;

!!
LEXICON V_l/iegen__vblex !!= * @CODE@ liegen:lag
+V:%^A2E%>en  Praf_ST ;    ! ge-formen akseptiert.
+V@D.PTC@:0@D.PTC@ V_l/iegen__vb_01 ;
+V000@D.PTC@:%^A2IE@D.PTC@ Inf ;
LEXICON V_l/iegen__vb_01
:%^A2IE  IND-PRS-SG1 ;
:%^A2IE IND-PRS-SG2 ;
:%^A2IE IND-PRS-SG3 ;
:%^A2IE IND-PRS-PL1 ;
:%^A2IE  IND-PRS-PL2 ;
:%^A2IE IND-PRS-PL3 ;

: IND-PRT_SEIN ;
:%^A2IE SUBJ-PRS ;
:%^Umlaut SUBJ-PRT_SEIN ;
+Imprt+Sg2:%^A2IE POST-V_01 ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%^A2IE%>t POST-V_01 ;

!!
LEXICON IND-PRS-SG1
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>e  POST-V_01 ;
LEXICON IND-PRS-SG2
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>st POST-V_01 ;
LEXICON IND-PRS-SG3
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t  POST-V_01 ;
LEXICON IND-PRS-PL1
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>en POST-V_01 ;
LEXICON IND-PRS-PL2
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t  POST-V_01 ;
LEXICON IND-PRS-PL3
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>en POST-V_01 ;


LEXICON POST-V_01
@D.SUP@ POST-V_02 ;


@D.FOR-PREFIX@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.PREFIX.AN-AUS@ PREFIX-AN/AUS ;
 @R.PREFIX.FOR-MOTION-VERBS@ PREFIX-FOR-MOTION-VERBS ;


LEXICON PREFIX-AN/AUS
@R.FOR-PREFIX.an@:@R.FOR-PREFIX.an@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.aus@:@R.FOR-PREFIX.aus@ POST-V_03 ;

LEXICON PREFIX-FOR-MOTION-VERBS
! THERE are limits to the length of continuation lexicon names
! PREFIX-AN-AUF-AUS-DURCH-EIN-FORT-HINAUF-HINAUS-HINEIN-HIN-HINÜBER-HINUNTER-HOCH-LOS-MIT-NACH-UNTER-VORAN-VORAUS-VORBEI-VOR-WEG-WEITER-ZU-ZURÜCK
!!##
@R.FOR-PREFIX.ab@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.abhande@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.an@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.auf@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.aus@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.auseinander@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.bei@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.dabei@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.daher@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.dahin@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.daneben@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.dar@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.daran@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.darauf@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.davon@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.dazwischen@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.drauf@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.durch@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.durcheinander@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.ein@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.einher@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.empor@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.entgegen@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.entlang@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.entzwei@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.fehl@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.fertig@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.fort@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.fremd@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.gut@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.heim@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.her@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herab@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.heran@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herauf@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.heraus@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herbei@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herein@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hernieder@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herum@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herunter@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hervor@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herzu@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.herüber@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hin@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinab@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinan@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinauf@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinaus@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinein@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinfort@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinter@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinunter@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinweg@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinzu@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hinüber@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.hoch@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.irr@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.kaputt@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.klar@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.lang@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.los@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.längs@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.mit@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.nach@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.nahe@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.nieder@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.näher@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.ran@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.rauf@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.raus@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.rein@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.rum@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.runter@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.rüber@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.schief@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.tot@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.um@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.unter@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.voll@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.vonstatten@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.vor@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.voran@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.voraus@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.vorbei@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.vorwärts@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.vorüber@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.weg@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.weiter@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.wieder@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zu@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zugrunde@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zurecht@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zurück@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zusammen@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zustande@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.zuvor@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.über@ POST-V_03 ;
@R.FOR-PREFIX.überein@ POST-V_03 ;

LEXICON POST-V_02
 POST-V_03 ;


LEXICON POST-V_03
 POST-V_04 ;

LEXICON POST-V_04
#;
