src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs_D
obliegen:oblag V_l/iegen__vblex ;
LEXICON Verbs_D-NOge
liegen:lag V_l/iegen__vblex ;
LEXICON VERBS_01
dürfen:darf V_/dürfen__vblex ;
liegen:lag V_l/iegen__vblex ;
